Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5670.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 12-7-21 of the General Laws in Chapter 12-7 entitled "Arrest" is
hereby amended to read as follows:
12-7-21. “Peace officer” defined.
“Peace officer,” as used within this chapter, means the following individuals or members
of:
(1) Rhode Island state police;
(2) Any member of a municipal or local police department;
(3) Rhode Island airport corporation police;
(4) Rhode Island park police;
(5) Rhode Island capitol police;
(6) Rhode Island conservation officers;
(7) Rhode Island department of environmental management officers;
(8) Rhode Island fire marshals;
(9) Brown University police officers;
(10) University of Rhode Island campus police officers;
(11) Rhode Island College campus security;
(12) Campus security at the Community College of Rhode Island;
(13) Rhode Island sheriff’s department;
(14) The investigators of the department of attorney general appointed pursuant to § 42-9-

8.1;
(15) Any federal law enforcement officer;
(16) Correctional investigators, chief inspector and inspectors within the office of
inspections, and correctional officers of the Rhode Island department of corrections;
(17) The witness protection coordinator of the department of attorney general;
(18) The warden, associate wardens, majors, captains, lieutenants, sergeants, correctional
officers and investigators employed by a project operated by a municipal detention facility
corporation, including, but not limited to, the Donald W. Wyatt Detention Facility; provided, such
parties listed in this subsection (18) herein shall be deemed to be peace officers while in
performance of their duties for the municipal detention facility only, and shall not be deemed to be
peace officers at any time when they are not in performance of said duties;
(19) Retired non-permanent sworn members of any municipal police department shall be
deemed to be peace officers only while in the performance of their duties for any municipal police
department, and shall be permitted to carry their firearm while in the performance of their duties
for the municipal police department, and shall be subject to in-service training requirements of title
42, chapter 28;
(20) Auto theft investigators appointed pursuant to § 31-50-1;
(21) Providence fire department arson investigators; provided, that the arson investigator
is a graduate of a police-training academy; and
(22) Rhode Island School of Design police officers.; and
(23) Juvenile program workers and shift coordinators of the department of children, youth
and families.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002121
========
LC002121 - Page 2 of 3